Louisiana, session 2026, HB797.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70: THE BAYOU GOLD PROGRAM
§3301. Bayou Gold Program; certification
A. For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Account holder" means a person with a single account or joint account
in an electronic payment platform.
(2) "Allocated precious metals" means gold or silver bullion held in custody
on a fully reserved, one-to-one basis, owned by the account holder, and not subject
to lending, rehypothecation, or encumbrance.
(3) "Bullion depository" means an entity providing vault facilities within the
United States for the storage of gold bullion and silver bullion that do all of the
following:
(a) Complies with the prescribed London Bullion Market Association or
equivalent best practice guidelines.
(b) Holds gold bullion and silver bullion.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 797 ENROLLED
(4) "Certification" means formal recognition granted by the department that
an electronic payment platform meets the standards established pursuant to this
Chapter.
(5) "Department" means the Department of the Treasury.
(6) "Electronic payment platform" means a private entity that provides
financial services based on gold- and silver-backed electronic transfer transactional
accounts rather than fiat currency accounts.
(7) "Fiat currency" means government-issued currency that is declared legal
tender by a governmental authority and is not backed by a physical asset.
(8) "Program" means the Bayou Gold Program established pursuant to this
Chapter.
B.(1) The department shall establish and administer the Bayou Gold Program
in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter.
(2) The program shall provide a voluntary certification framework for
qualifying electronic payment platforms that offer gold- and silver-backed
transactional services for account holders.
(3) The department shall maintain a publicly accessible registry of certified
electronic payment platforms.
(4) The department may develop and authorize the use of a "Bayou Gold
Program" name, logo, or certification mark for use by certified electronic payment
platforms.
(5) The department shall not operate, manage, or own a gold or silver
depository or payment processor pursuant to this Chapter.
C. To be eligible for certification under the program, an electronic payment
platform shall meet all of the following criteria:
(1) Maintain allocated precious metals stored in a secure bullion depository
facility meeting industry best-practice standards, set by the London Bullion Market
Association or COMEX, for security, insurance, fraud prevention, and auditing.
(2) Utilize a bullion depository located within the state of Louisiana or a
bordering state.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 797 ENROLLED
(3) Ensure that a customer's precious metals are all of the following:
(a) Remain the sole legal property of the customer.
(b) Do not appear as assets on the electronic payment platform's balance
sheet.
(c) Are not subject to claims of creditors of the electronic payment platform.
(d) Are not lent, pledged, or rehypothecated.
(4) Provide proof that all customer holdings are backed on a fully reserved,
one-to-one basis.
(5) Maintain policies and procedures consistent with allocated ownership.
(6) Ensure precious metals held under the program fulfill all of the following
requirements:
(a) Maintain a documented chain of integrity.
(b) Are refined by a London Bullion Market Association- or
COMEX-approved refinery.
(c) Meet recognized-industry grade standards set by the London Bullion
Market Association or COMEX.
(d) Are in globally accepted bullion forms.
(7) Provide the ability for customers to redeem their gold or silver in
physical form within five business days of notice, subject to reasonable logistics and
security procedures.
(8) Provide real-time or near real-time transactional capability allowing
customers to conduct payments based on allocated precious metals.
(9) Clearly disclose all fees, spreads, and compensation structures to
customers.
D.(1) An electronic payment platform seeking certification pursuant to this
Chapter shall submit an application to the department, including but not limited to
the following:
(a) Proof that the account holder's gold and silver bullion are fully allocated.
(b) Most recent independent audit reports.
(c) Evidence of insurance coverage.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 797 ENROLLED
(d) A description of custody arrangements.
(e) A description of payment system capabilities.
(f) An attestation from the electronic payment platform that the information
it provides to the department is accurate.
(2) The department may request additional documentation reasonably
necessary to evaluate compliance.
(3) The department shall either grant or deny certification within sixty
calendar days of receiving a completed application.
E.(1) The department may establish reasonable application and renewal fees
sufficient to cover administrative costs of the program.
(2) The department may conduct periodic reviews to ensure continued
compliance with this Chapter.
(3) The department may revoke certification for any electronic payment
platform upon a finding of material noncompliance pursuant to this Chapter.
F. Certification is valid for two years from the date of issuance and a
certified electronic payment platform may reapply for renewal prior to expiration.
G. An electronic payment platform that falsely claims certification pursuant
to the Bayou Gold Program shall be subject to penalties as determined by the
department, including civil fines and public removal from the registry.
H. Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to do any of the following:
(1) Create a state guarantee of deposits.
(2) Impose financial liability upon the state for actions of certified electronic
payment platforms.
(3) Establish a state-operated precious metals financial system.
I. The department shall not be liable for any action of an electronic payment
platform that is certified pursuant to this Chapter.
Section 2.(A) The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective
when an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of
monies for the implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 797 ENROLLED
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by
the governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills
to become law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section
18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently
approved by the legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on
the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.